Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.120

Board of trustees—Name of board—Qualification of members.

The district board shall be called "The board of trustees of . . . . . . mosquito control district."

Each member of the board appointed by the governing body of a city shall be an elector of the city from which he or she is appointed and a resident of that portion of the city which is in the district.

Each member appointed from a county or portion of a county shall be an elector of the county and a resident of that portion of the county which is in the district.

Each member appointed at large shall be an elector of the district.

[ 2011 c 336 s 465; 1957 c 153 s 12.]